Oklahoma, session 2026, SB994.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 27 O.S. 2021, Section 7, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7. A. Except as otherwise provided in this section,


any person, firm, or corporation organized under the laws of this


state, or authorized to do business in this state, to furnish light,


heat, or power by electricity or natural gas, or any other person,


association, or firm engaged in furnishing lights, heat, or power by


electricity or natural gas shall have and exercise the right of


eminent domain in the same manner and by like proceedings as


provided for railroad corporations by laws of this state.


B. The power of eminent domain shall not be used for the siting


or building of wind turbines energy facilities, solar energy

Req. No. 487 Page 1


facilities, battery storage facilities, hydrogen gas facilities, or


carbon capture and sequestration projects on private property.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-487 RD 1/19/2025 5:47:25 AM

































Req. No. 487 Page 2